Maine, session 132, LD1379.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 25 MRSA §2017 is enacted to read:
§2017. Public health warning
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Firearm" has the same meaning as in Title 17-A, section 2, subsection 12-A.
B. "Firearm dealer" means a person that is licensed as a dealer under 18 United States
Code, Section 923(a)(3) or that is required to be licensed as a dealer under that section.
C. "Gunsmith" means a person who designs, repairs or modifies firearms.
2. Public health warning sign and brochure. A firearm dealer or a gunsmith shall
prominently display a sign with the public health warning under subsection 3 at the business
premises of the firearm dealer or gunsmith where firearms are displayed, sold or transferred
and provide a purchaser or transferee of a firearm with a brochure containing the public
health warning. A public health warning sign under this subsection must be at least 11
inches by 17 inches and printed in large, bold font written in English and any other
predominant language in the community where the business premises are located. The
public health warning brochure must include additional information about firearm safety,
secure storage practices and resources for suicide prevention and domestic violence support
as developed by the Department of Health and Human Services.
3. Public health warning. A public health warning under this section must state:
"WARNING: Firearms pose a significant risk to public health and safety. Access to a
firearm in the home increases the risk of suicide, domestic violence fatalities and
unintentional deaths, particularly among children. Keep firearms locked and unloaded
when not in use. For help, contact the Maine Crisis Line at [insert telephone number
provided by the Department of Health and Human Services for a hotline for suicide and
crisis services]."
4. Department of Health and Human Services support. The Department of Health
and Human Services shall develop standardized public health warning signs and brochures
under subsection 2 and distribute the signs and brochures to all firearm dealers and
gunsmiths in the State. The Department of Health and Human Services shall collaborate
with firearm dealers and related business owners, public health experts and suicide
prevention advocates, including representatives of a gun shop project under section 2015,
to ensure all public health warning materials are accurate and effective.
5. Enforcement and penalties. The Department of Health and Human Services shall
monitor compliance with this section and may conduct an inspection of the business
premises of a firearm dealer or gunsmith to determine compliance. A person that violates
this section is subject to:
A. For a first offense, a written warning; or
B. For a 2nd or subsequent offense, a penalty not to exceed $500.
6. Rules. The Department of Health and Human Services may adopt rules to carry out
this section. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined
in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Page 1 - 132LR1709(01)

Sec. 2. Department of Health and Human Services to implement guidance
within 90 days of effective date. The Department of Health and Human Services shall
perform the department's duties under the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 25, section 2017,
subsection 4 within 90 days of the effective date of this Act.
Sec. 3. Effective date. That portion of this Act that enacts the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 25, section 2017, subsection 2 takes effect 180 days after the effective date
of this Act.